Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2118
Department of Transportation; plan or program for specific highway improvements; certify compliance with Board of Public Roads Classifications and Standards.

The Department of Transportation shall annually develop, adopt, and maintain as a public record a plan or program for specific highway improvements for the current year. In so doing, the department shall take into account all federal funds which will be available to the department for such year. The department shall annually certify compliance with the requirements of this section to the Board of Public Roads Classifications and Standards using the certification form developed by the board pursuant to section 39-2120.

Laws 1969, c. 312, § 18, p. 1125;

Laws 1971, LB 100, § 7;

Laws 1976, LB 724, § 4;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 155;

Laws 2019, LB82, § 8.